Utah statutes.
48-1d-1303.   Name limitations.

(1)  The name of a domestic professional services partnership and of a foreign professional services partnership authorized to transact business in this state, in addition to complying with Sections 48-1d-1105 and 48-1d-1206:

(a)  may not contain language stating or implying that it is formed for a purpose other than that authorized by Section 48-1d-1304; and

(b)  must conform with any rule made by the regulating board having jurisdiction over a professional service to be rendered by the professional service partnership.

(2)  Sections 48-1d-1105 and 48-1d-1206 do not prevent the use of a name otherwise prohibited by those sections if the name is:

(a)  the personal name of an individual partner or individual former partner of the professional services partnership; or

(b)  the name of an individual who was associated with a predecessor of the professional services partnership.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

